District of Columbia statutes.
1-1171.06a

Omitted

Conforming amendment.

Omitted.

Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-335, § 7a
as added Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-80, § 2(g), 61 DCR 169
D.C. Law 18-335, § 7a, as added by D.C. Law 20-80, § 2(g), is codified as § 1-1161.01(7)(E-i).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 18-335, § 7a, amending subdivision (7) of this section, see § 2(g) of the Prohibition on Government Employee Engagement in Political Activity Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-231, December 20, 2013, 61 DCR 3, 20 DCSTAT 2633).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 18-335, § 7a, amending subdivision (7) of this section, see § 2(g) of the Prohibition on Government Employee Engagement in Political Activity Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-25, March 7, 2013, 60 DCR 3986, 20 DCSTAT 485).
For temporary (225 days) addition of D.C. Law 18-335, § 7a, see § 2(g) of the Prohibition on Government Employee Engagement in Political Activity Temporary Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Law 20-4, May 18, 2013, 60 DCR 4624, 20 DCSTAT 1268).